be_BY.aff
SFX w Y 16
SFX w ць ся [іы]ць 
SFX w ць цеся [іы]ць 
SFX w ець іся ець 
SFX w ець іцеся ець 
SFX w аць ыся [жрчш]аць 
SFX w аць ыцеся [жрчш]аць 
SFX w аць іся [мп]аць 
SFX w аць іцеся [мп]аць 
SFX w цца ся [іы]цца 
SFX w цца цеся [іы]цца 
SFX w ецца іся ецца 
SFX w ецца іцеся ецца 
SFX w ацца ыся [жрчш]ацца 
SFX w ацца ыцеся [жрчш]ацца 
SFX w ацца іся [мп]ацца 
SFX w ацца іцеся [мп]ацца 
SFX q Y 18
SFX q ць цца ць 
SFX q іць юся [аеёілноу]іць 
SFX q іць люся [бмпф]іць 
SFX q віць ўлюся віць 
SFX q зіць жуся зіць 
SFX q сіць шуся сіць 
SFX q ціць чуся [аеёіоуыэюя]ціць 
SFX q сціць шчуся сціць 
SFX q ыць уся ыць 
SFX q зець жуся зець 
SFX q цець чуся цець 
SFX q аць уся [жрчш]аць 
SFX q ць ўся [аеіы]ць 
SFX q ць лася [аеіы]ць 
SFX q ць ліся [аеіы]ць 
SFX q цца ўся [аеіы]цца 
SFX q цца лася [аеіы]цца 
SFX q цца ліся [аеіы]цца 
SFX o Y 5
SFX o ць ш [іы]ць 
SFX o ць м [іы]ць 
SFX o ць це [іы]ць 
SFX o іць яць іць 
SFX o ыць аць ыць 
SFX t Y 11
SFX t ць цца [іы]ць 
SFX t ць шся [іы]ць 
SFX t ць мся [іы]ць 
SFX t ць цеся [іы]ць 
SFX t іць яцца іць 
SFX t ыць ацца ыць 
SFX t цца шся цца 
SFX t цца мся цца 
SFX t цца цеся цца 
SFX t іцца яцца іцца 
SFX t ыцца ацца ыцца 
SFX v Y 4
SFX v іць яць іць 
SFX v ыць аць ыць 
SFX v іцца яцца іцца 
SFX v ыцца ацца ыцца 
SFX K Y 1
SFX K 0 ся . 
